Massachusetts, session 194th, S1931.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
amended by striking out in paragraph (k)(3)(ii) the figure "$600,000" and replacing it with the
figure "$1,800,000."
Said Section Section 6 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is further amended in
paragraph (k)(4) by inserting the words ", for a taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
2027, " before the words "the valuation limit in this subsection."
of 1